Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-677
Bonds; sinking funds; tax to provide.

When such bonds shall have been issued by the city, the mayor and council shall have power to levy annually upon all taxable property of the city such tax as may be necessary for a sinking fund for the payment of accruing interest on such bonds and the principal thereof at maturity, and to provide for the office of water commissioner, power commissioner, light commissioner or heat commissioner, and to prescribe the powers and duties of such officers.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 54, p. 273;

Laws 1905, c. 23, § 2, p. 245;

Laws 1907, c. 14, § 1, p. 122;

Laws 1909, c. 19, § 1, p. 185;

R.S.1913, § 4954;

Laws 1917, c. 97, § 1, p. 261;

Laws 1919, c. 38, § 1, p. 121;

Laws 1921, c. 169, § 1, p. 662;

C.S.1922, § 4123;

C.S.1929, § 16-652;

Laws 1931, c. 29, § 1, p. 119;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-652;

R.S.1943, § 16-677.